src/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+SP+Tra+Indef: __cat/kissa__
!!€ псака%>втО1мО1%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>кс
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0нзо%>кс
!! псака+N+SP+Gen+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def
!!€ псака%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>%{оеэØ%}нть
!!€ псака%>0нзо%>0нть

"%{оэØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{оэØ%}:0 <=>   _  %> А2: ;


"O1:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
О1:0 <=>   _  %> [А2:а|А2:я] ;


"%{ое%}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ое%}:е <=> FT _ ;
         :FTV в (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %>  %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}:0 в:  _ л  ;
         [ :FTV ( (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %>  %{оеэØ%}:0 ) ] в _ л  ;
         FT (%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э )  м  _ к  ;


"%{ое%}:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ое%}:о <=> LBC _ ;
          :BTV в ( %{back%}: ) %> %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}:0 в: _ л  ;
          :BTV ( ( %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: ) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 ) )  в _ л  ;
!         [ LBC - [ :* в ]  | :BTV ] %> [%{оеэØ%}:0 |%{оеэØ%}:о] в _ л ь ;
         LBC (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:о )  м  _ к  ;

!!Changes in the suffix vowels
!"A2:ya"
!А2:я <=> [ FTC | :FTV | ь | :FTV NPC | :FTV Cns* CnsNonDent | LFCS :FTV ( (н) т ( Ь2: ) | н Ь2: ) ]  %> т _ [ д | н | м ] ;
!2013-03-16! [ FTC | :FTV | ь | :FTV NPC | :FTV Cns* CnsNonDent | LFCS :FTV ( (н) т ( Ь2: ) | н Ь2: ) ]  %> [ т | TLoss:0 ( %> ) т:0 ] _  [ д | н | м ] ;
!         [ CnsDent [  ь:0 |я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | и:0 | ю:0 ]| Vows [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | й:0 ] | [ LFCS ( :FTV ) %>  | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ] ( (н) т  Ь2:0  | н Ь2: )  ]  %>  _ [ т | н ] ;


!HERE
"A2:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
А2:а <=>  [ LBC | :BTV ] %> т  _  [ д | н ] ;
   %{оэØ%}: %> _ [ д | н | т] ;
         [CnsDent ( э:0 | ы:0 | а:0 | О1: | о:0 | у:0 )|  в: т %{оеэ%}: м  О1:0 | CnsNonDent ( Vows:0 ) | [ LBC ( :BTV ) %>  |  %{оеэØ%}:о ]  ((н) т Ь2:0 | н Ь2: )  ] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;

"j:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
й:0 <=> :Vows _  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> [  %{иы%}: | А2:я | %{оеэØ%}:е ] ;
! Vows _ %> [  %{иы%}: | А2:я | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:0 | О1:е |О1:0 ] ;
!!€ сай%>%{оеэØ%}%>дО1
!!€ са0%>е%>де

!
!18.04.2007 Adding "U2:" and contemplating environment "%> т н _"
!
"Е3:э always" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ %> т н _ 2013-02-23
Е3:э <=     [ CnsDent ] (%{backHard%}:|%{frontHard%}:)  %>  т н _ [ # | %- | %> [ Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];

"Е3:э sometimes" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ %> т н _ 2013-02-23
Е3:э =>     [ CnsDent | BTV Cns* CnsNonDent | CnsHardNonDent ] (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:|%{frontHard%}:)  %>  т н _ [ # | %- | %> [ Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];

"ye:e always" 
!! __@RULENAME@__  
е:э <=>
          CnsDent (О1:0) %>  :н _ [[  # | %-| %> Г1:0 а:я]| н ь: | к] ;
!          [[[Back - [ :* Vows]] %> | CnsDent]  %> ] т н _ [ # |  %- |%> [ Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


!"ye:e sometimes"
!е:э =>
!          [CnsDent|CnsNonDent] ( О1:0 ) %>  н _ [[  # | %- | %> Г1:0 а:я ] | н ь: | к ] ;
!          [ CnsDent | CnsNonDent | м:0 ]  ( О1:0 ) %> ( VLoss:0 ) ( TLoss:0 ) т н _ [ # | %- | %> [ Г1:0 а:я | т | л | Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


! вазнэ, верьгизнэ, ривезьке
"Н1:н"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Н1:н <=> [[ в | д | й | л | м | н | р ] ( ь: ) | Vows: ] %> _ е:  ;
         .#. [в | л | п ] а з %> _ е: ; 
"Н1:к"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Н1:к <=> [ б | г | к | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ] ( ь: ) %> _ е:  ;
         [ [Vows] - [ а ] ] з ( ь ) %> _ е: ;
         [[Cns] - [в | л | п ]] а з ( ь ) %> _ е: ;

"а: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 а:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"о: ы Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 о:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"у: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 у:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;


"э: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 э:ы <=> [ д | з | л | н | р | с | т | ц ]  _ %> Н1: е ;

"а: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 а:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;

"о: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 о:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;


"у: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 у:и <=> [ б | в | г | ж | к | м | п | ф | х | ч | ш | щ ] _ %> Н1: е ;

"я: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 я:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"ё: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ё:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"ю: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ю:и <=>  _ %> Н1: е ;

"е: и Dimin"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 е:и <=>  [ Cns | Vows ] Cns   _ %> Н1: е ;
   .#. [[ Cns ] - [ п ]]  _ %> Н1: е ;
          
"a:ya"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
а:я  <=> :Vows ((%>) К3:0 )  %> [ Г1:0 | Г4:0 ] _  ;



!Changes in suffix consonants
"v:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
в:0 <=> [ :Cns  ( ь: | :0) ] %> _ т [%{оеэ%}:о|%{оеэ%}:е|%{оеэ%}:э] м [О1:о|О1:е|О1:0] ;
    в %> %^WLoss: %> %{оеэØ%}: _ %{ое%}: л  ;

!Depricated due to 
!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г1:0 <=> [ :Vows ((%>) К3:0 )  %> | К1: Ь2:0 %> KLoss:0 | :к %> KLoss:0 ]  _ а:я ;

"G1:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г1:г <=> [CnsVoicedDent (:ь|Ь2:0)| й | [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь )] %>  _ а ;

"G1:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г1:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь | Ь2:0 | Ь2:ь ) | CnsVoicelessNonDent | г | К1: Ь2: | К4:0 ]  %> _ а  ;
          

!Prolative
"G2:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г2:г <=> [ CnsVoicedDent ( :ь )| [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь ) ] %> _ а: ;

"G2:v"! 
Г2:в <=> [ :Vows (:0) %> | :Vows ] _ а: [ # | %- |%> [ Г1:0 |  %{оеэØ%}:  SIVV |т | н | м | с | д: | в | к с | л | А2: ] ];


"G2:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г2:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь )| CnsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь )| г ] %> _ а: [ # |  %- |%> [ Г1:0 | %{оеэØ%}: SIVV | т | н | с | д: | в | к с | л ] ] ;
           Vows CnsVoiceless  %> VLoss:0 _ а: ;

! 2012-08-07
"G4:g" !Imperative Clitics
Г4:г  <=> з ь %> _ а ;


"G4:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г4:0  <=>
           [ К1: Ь2: | к ] %> _ а ;
  [О1:е|О1:о|и|ы] %> _ а: ;

"G4:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г4:к  <=>  # [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %> _ а  ;


"m:0" 
м:0 <=>
  т (ь) _ (HarmDummies:) %> с [#|%-|(т) %{оэØ%}:] ;
!! потмо+N+Relator+SP+Ela+Indef: __inside/sisäosa__
!!€ потм%{back%}%>ст%{оэØ%}
!!€ пот00%>сто
! BTV  _ У2:0  %>  VLoss: [ т | т н е:э ] ;
!        т (ь) _ [ У2: ]  %>  VLoss: [с (т) [О1:э|О1:о|О1:0]|с [  # | %-| %> [Г1:0|Г1:к]]] ;



!! imperative suffix
"K1:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
К1:т <=>   Cns ( ь: ) (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ Ь2: [ # | %- | %> ] ;

!! лыказевемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: __have taken__
!!€ лыказев%>К1Ь2
!!€ лыказев%>ть


"K1:к"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
К1:к <=> Vows (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ Ь2: [ # | %- ]  ;

!! ливтемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+Clt/Га: __set out/laittaa esille__
!!€ ливть%>К1Ь2%>Г4а
!!€ ливть%>к0%>0а
!THIS needs a separate rule 2020-03-25


! Suffix final hard vs soft
"U4:y"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Ь2:ь <=>
 [ FTC |:FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* CnsNonDent | л ь: ] ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %>  К1:т  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;
[ LFCS | :FTV | ь: ]  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %>  т  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;
  [  :FTV ( %{frontSoft%}: )  %>  %{оеэØ%}:0 | %>  [ %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ]] [ н | ( н | в ) т ]  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;

!#  [ [ [ LFCS   %> | :FTV  %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 ) | ь:  %> ] | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э | О1:е | О1:э ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ] |  [ LFCS | ь: | :FTV ] %> К1:т ]  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;
!! пильге+N+Pl+Nom+Indef __leg; foot/jalka__
!!€ пильг%{frontSoft%}%>тЬ2
!!€ пильг0%>ть
!! валдо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef __light/valo__
!!$ валд%{backHard%}%>тЬ2
!!$ валд0%>ть
!! лыказевемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: __have taken__
!!€ лыказев%>К1Ь2
!!€ лыказев%>ть

"U4:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Ь2:0 <=>
 [ LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) | :FTV (HarmDummies:) | LBCCns  (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:) | :BTV (%{back%}:) ] %> К1:  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;
 [ LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) | LBCCns (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:) | :BTV (%{back%}:) ] %> т  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;

#  [  LFCH | :BTV ] (%{frontHard%}: | %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: ) %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:о ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ] _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;

 LBC (%{backHard%}: | %{back%}: ) %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 |%{оеэØ%}:о ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ]  _  [ # | %- | %>  Г1: ] ;
 

!! валдо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef __light/valo__
!!€ валд%{backHard%}%>тЬ2
!!€ валд0%>т0



!!!TLoss sloppy
!"t:0"
!т:0 <=> [ [ т | К1:т ] ( Ь2: ) %> TLoss:0 | т У2:0 %> VLoss:0 TLoss:0 ] ( %> ) _ ;

!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
с:0 <=> с _ %>  с ;
! с _ %> SLoss:0 с ;

!!€ класс%>с
!!€ клас0%>с


!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
д:т  <=> [ CnsVoiceless | д | г] (ь:0)  %> _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
!!€ кедь%>дО1
!!€ кед0%>те
!         т [ И2:0 ] %> VLoss:0 _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
!Word final Vowels


"y:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
ь:0 <=> Cns _ %^Ь2ZERO: ;
!!кель+N+Sg+Gen+Def: __language__
!!€ кель^Ь2ZERO%>енть
!!€ кел00%>енть
     CnsDent  _  %> [ А2:я | %{иы%}: | %{оеэØ%}:е | О1:е ];
    CnsDentNoL _ ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> [в:0 т %{оеэ%}:е м [О1:е|О1:0] | К1: Ь2: | Н1:н | н | д: | ц е: [ # | %- | %> ] | т | с (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;



!"U2:0"
!У2:0 <=>  _ %> VLoss:0 [ ( TLoss:0 ) т [ Ь2:0 | Ь2:ь | А2:а ] | ( TLoss:0 ) т н е: |с (т) [О1:о|О1:0]| с [ %> | # | %- ] ] ;
!          _ %> VLoss:0 д: [ О1:о ] ;

!"U2:o"
!У2:о  <=>  _ [ %> [ (н) т Ь2:0 | н Ь2:0 | т н е: | с ь: | с (т) [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ %> |  # |  %- ] | з %> %{оеэØ%}: | л  |  (н) з [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | Г2:в | д | с т [ %> |  # | %- ] ] | Г1:0|  # | %- ] ;


!Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
TLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow KLoss after non-k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
KLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :к ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow %^WLoss after non-v"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%^WLoss:0 /<= [ [ Letters ] - [ в ] ] %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}: в: ;
!%^WLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* [ в л | в О1: л ] ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow Н1:н after Letters"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Н1:н /<= Letters _ ;

"Disallow з where not following l, n or r"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 з:з /<=  \[л | р | н ] (ь:) %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}:  ;




!!OLD

!"Disallow %{ОØ%} where not T, sO, stO, s"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{ОØ%}:0 /<= _ %> \[ т Ь2: | т н Е3: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;
!! чувто+N+Pl+Nom+Def: __tree/puu__
!!€ чувт%{ОØ%}%>тнЕ3
!!€ чувт0%>тнэ

!"Disallow %{ЕØ%}:0 where not T, sO, stO, s"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{ЕØ%}:0 /<= _ %> \[ т Ь2: | т н Е3: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;

!"Disallow %{ОØ%}:ь where not T, sO, stO, s"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{ЕØ%}:ь /<= _ %> \[ т Ь2: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;

!! веле+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2
!!€ веле%>%{оеэØ%}кс%>%{оеэØ%}тЬ2
!!€ веле%>0кс%>эть

!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3+Clt/Gak
!!€ псака%>втО1мО1%>%{оеэØ%}тЬ2%>%{оеэØ%}линек%>Г1ак
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0т0%>олинек%>как
!! ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2
!!€ ош%>%{оеэØ%}з%>%{оеэØ%}тЬ2
!!€ ош%>оз%>от0
!       	     :BTV в %^WLoss:0  %> _ в: ( О1: ) л ;
!!€ эряв%>^WLoss%>{ОЕЭØ}вО1ль
!!€ эряв%>0%>00оль

!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+SP+Tra+Indef: __cat/kissa__
!!€ псака%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>кс
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0нзо%>кс

!! веле+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3: __village/kylä__
!!€ веле%>%{оеэØ%}кс%>%{оеэØ%}тЬ2%>%{оеэØ%}льть
!!€ веле%>0кс%>эт0%>ельть

"Disallow %^NoLinkVow after vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
%^NoLinkVow:0 /<= :Vows  (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;

"Disallow s for control of stems with inessive..."
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
с:с /<= [т|д|к|г|п|б|м|н|л|р|в|й:|ф|х] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: _ [#|%-|(т) %{оэØ%}:] ;

"Disallow k for control of comparative with stem types"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
к:к /<=
 [н] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: ш _ а: ; ! comparative
 [к ] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: _ с ; ! translative
 
!!TESTS
!echo 'п а н ж > с ы' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/myv-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'панжомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
